Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-1204
Deputies; appointment and compensation.

The county attorney may, with the approval and consent of the county board, appoint one or more deputies, who shall receive such compensation as shall be fixed by the county board, to assist him in the discharge of his duties.

Laws 1885, c. 40, § 6, p. 217;

Laws 1893, c. 2, § 1, p. 64;

Laws 1901, c. 8, § 1, p. 57;

R.S.1913, § 5599;

Laws 1917, c. 108, § 1, p. 278;

Laws 1919, c. 62, § 1, p. 169;

Laws 1921, c. 232, § 1, p. 830;

C.S.1922, § 4916;

Laws 1923, c. 41, § 1, p. 156;

Laws 1927, c. 116, § 2, p. 326;

C.S.1929, § 26-904;

Laws 1943, c. 90, § 14, p. 302;

R.S.1943, § 23-1204;

Laws 1947, c. 73, § 2, p. 233;

Laws 1947, c. 72, § 2, p. 230;

Laws 1947, c. 62, § 5, p. 200;

Laws 1949, c. 42, § 1(1), p. 144;

Laws 1961, c. 99, § 1, p. 330.

For minimum salary of deputies, see section 23-1114.09.

County attorney of Douglas County is authorized to appoint deputies to assist him in the discharge of his duties, and a deputy so appointed and qualified may sign a criminal information. Thompson v. O'Grady, 137 Neb. 641, 290 N.W. 716 (1940).

When appointed by county attorney, a duly qualified deputy may sign criminal information. Holland v. State, 100 Neb. 444, 160 N.W. 893 (1916).

In action for compensation as assistant, allegation in petition that attorney assisted county attorney under appointment of court is sufficient to show that services were procured by county attorney. Lear v. Brown County, 77 Neb. 230, 109 N.W. 174 (1906).